Hawaii statutes.
§48E-18 Special purpose revenue bonds as
legal investments and lawful security. The special purpose revenue bonds
issued pursuant to this chapter shall be and are hereby declared to be legal
and authorized investments for banks, savings banks, trust companies, building
and loan associations, insurance companies, credit unions, fiduciaries,
trustees, guardians, and for all public funds of the State or other political
corporations or subdivisions of the State. Such special purpose revenue bonds
shall be eligible to secure the deposit of any and all public funds of the
State and any and all public funds of counties or other political corporations
or subdivisions of the State, and such bonds shall be lawful and sufficient
security for such deposits to the extent of their value when accompanied by all
unmatured coupons appertaining thereto. [L 1983, c 237, pt of §2; am L 1990, c
59, §8]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next